Mississippi, session 2026, SB2684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 7-11-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 7-11-4.  (1)  The words "State Land Commissioner," "land commissioner," "state land office" and "land office" shall mean the Secretary of State wherever they appear in Sections 3-5-11, 21-33-69, 21-37-49, 25-7-83, 27-3-43, 27-29-1, 27-35-65, 27-35-69, 27-39-319, 27-45-21, 29-1-1, 29-1-5, 29-1-7, 29-1-9, 29-1-13, 29-1-17, 29-1-21, 29-1-25, 29-1-27, 29-1-31, 29-1-33, 29-1-35, 29-1-37, 29-1-43, 29-1-49, 29-1-51, 29-1-53, 29-1-55, 29-1-57, 29-1-59, 29-1-61, 29-1-63, 29-1-65, 29-1-67, 29-1-69, 29-1-71, 29-1-77, 29-1-79, 29-1-83, 29-1-85, 29-1-87, 29-1-89, 29-1-91, 29-1-93, 29-1-95, 29-1-99, 29-1-101, 29-1-107, 29-1-111, 29-1-113, 29-1-115, 29-1-119, 29-1-123, 29-1-131, 29-1-133, 33-11-11, 49-5-1, 51-29-81, 51-29-85, 51-29-87, 51-33-43, 51-33-45, 51-35-159, 55-3-9, 55-7-13, 55-13-31, 59-9-21, 59-9-67, 89-11-3, 89-11-15, 89-11-19, 89-11-21, 89-11-27 and 89-11-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, or in any other place where they appear in the laws of this state. (2)   For the purposes of this chapter, the words "blight" or "blighted" shall mean, but is not limited to, any of the following: (a)  Dilapidation or structural deterioration, including unsafe, collapsing, or partially collapsed buildings, roofs, walls, foundations, or load-bearing elements; (b)  Abandonment or vacancy, evidenced by long-term unoccupancy, boarded or broken windows or doors, lack of lawful utilities, or other indicia that the property is not being maintained; (c)  Unsanitary or unsafe conditions, including the accumulation of trash, debris, junk, garbage, vermin, or hazardous materials; (d)  Fire, flood, storm, or disaster damage that has not been timely repaired and poses a continuing risk to persons or property; (e)  Code violations related to building, housing, health, or safety standards that remain uncorrected after notice and reasonable opportunity to cure; (f)  Nuisance conditions, including persistent criminal activity, illegal dumping, or conditions that attract criminal behavior or create a public hazard; (g)  Environmental hazards, including contamination, standing water, mold, or conditions conducive to the spread of disease; or (h)  Neglect or failure to maintain the property in a manner consistent with minimum health and safety standards. SECTION 2.  Section 7-11-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 7-11-11.  (1)  The Secretary of State shall have charge of the swamp and the overflowed lands and indemnity lands in lieu thereof, the internal improvement lands, the lands forfeited to the state for nonpayment of taxes after the time allowed by law for redemption shall have expired, and of all other public lands belonging to or under the control of the state.  The regulation, sale and disposition of all such lands shall be made through the Secretary of State's office. (2)  The Secretary of State shall sign all conveyances and leases of any and all state-owned lands and shall record same in a book kept in his or her office for such purposes. (3)  Within ninety (90) days after the time allowed by law for redemption shall have expired for the lands forfeited to the state for nonpayment of taxes, the Secretary of State shall make a determination of whether or not such lands are blighted property upon petition of the tax sale purchaser and payment of a fee in an amount to be determined by the Secretary of State, not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). SECTION 3.  Section 15-1-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 15-1-13.  (1)  Except as provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this section, ten (10) years' actual adverse possession by any person claiming to be the owner for that time of any land, uninterruptedly continued for ten (10) years by occupancy, descent, conveyance, or otherwise, in whatever way such occupancy may have commenced or continued, shall vest in every actual occupant or possessor of such land a full and complete title, saving to persons under the disability of minority or unsoundness of mind the right to sue within ten (10) years after the removal of such disability, as provided in Section 15-1-7.  However, the saving in favor of persons under disability of unsoundness of mind shall never extend longer than thirty-one (31) years. (2)  For claims of adverse possession not matured as of July 1, 1998, the provisions of subsection (1) shall not apply to a landowner upon whose property a fence or driveway has been built who files with the chancery clerk within the ten (10) years required by this section a written notice that such fence or driveway is built without the permission of the landowner.  Failure to file such notice shall not create any inference that property has been adversely possessed.  The notice shall be filed in the land records by the chancery clerk and shall describe the property where said fence or driveway is constructed. (3)  One (1) year's actual adverse possession by any person claiming to be the owner for that time of any land determined to be blighted property by the Secretary of State under Section 7-11-11(3) from the date of the determination, uninterruptedly continued for one (1) year by occupancy, descent, conveyance, or otherwise, in whatever way such occupancy may have commenced or continued, shall vest in every actual occupant or possessor of such land a full and complete title. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.